Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 2
RACE MEETINGS

35-65-201 and 35-65-202. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire part repealed, p. 293, § 14, effective May 26.

Editor's note:

This part 2 was numbered as article 2 of chapter 54, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this part 2 prior to its repeal in 1977, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.